Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
634F

CITIZEN
PARTICIPATION IN GOVERNMENT]

Section

634F-1 Definitions

634F-2 Required procedures; motion

634F-3 Relationship to other laws

634F-4 Rule of construction

Law Journals and Reviews

Hawai‘i's Response to Strategic Litigation Against Public
Participation and the Protection of Citizens' Right to Petition the
Government. 24 UH L. Rev. 411 (2001).

Case Notes

Given the allegations in plaintiff's complaint, the filing of
the office of disciplinary counsel (ODC) complaint by defendant against
plaintiff did not constitute "public participation" before a
governmental body, as defined in §634F-1, because the ODC complaint did not
involve "oral or written testimony" but rather set forth allegations
and was a request to the ODC for an investigation. Based on the plain meaning
of "testimony", even when liberally construed, the ODC complaint and
allegations contained therein were not "testimony" and were not
protected under this chapter; legislative history of chapter discussed. 129 H.
95 (App.), 294 P.3d 1081 (2013).

With respect to plaintiff's claims based on defendant
siblings' communications with the mayor, the mayor's assistant, and members of
the county council, the communications did not constitute "testimony"
submitted or provided "during the course of a governmental
proceeding" and did not constitute a strategic lawsuit against public
participation. Even under a liberal construction of §634F-1, nothing in this
chapter suggests that an individual's unsolicited and informal communication
with a government official, when there is no formal process or procedure in
progress, constitutes "testimony submitted or provided to a governmental
body during the course of a governmental proceeding"; legislative history
of chapter discussed. 129 H. 95 (App.), 294 P.3d 1081 (2013).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next